Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.020

Records to be kept.

The governor must cause to be kept the following records:

First, a register of all pardons, commutations, executive paroles, final discharges, and restorations of citizenship made by him or her;

Second, an account of all his or her disbursements of state moneys, and of all rewards offered by him or her for the apprehension of criminals and persons charged with crime;

Third, a register of all appointments made by him or her with date of commission, name of appointee and name of predecessor, if any.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5013; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.020. Prior: 1921 c 28 s 1; 1890 p 628 s 2; RRS s 10983.]